Utah statutes.
73-12a-3.   Original compact -- Act as ratified.

The compact and treaty ratified by this act is the original signed by members of the Colorado River Commission, approved by a representative of the United States of America, and deposited in the archives of the Department of State of the United States at Washington, D.C. Any error made in copying the original compact and treaty as in Section 73-12a-2 hereof shall be held not to invalidate this ratification or compact and treaty in any way.

